District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.08

Repealer.

All orders and parts of orders in conflict with any of the provisions of this chapter are hereby repealed, except that any regulations adopted or promulgated by virtue of the authority granted by such orders, shall remain in force until properly revised, amended or repealed.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 9, 49 DCR 3444